California, session 20252026, AB2542.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as Marissa’s Law.SEC. 2. Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:7100. (a) The right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased person, the location and conditions of interment, and arrangements for funeral goods and services to be provided, unless other directions have been given by the decedent pursuant to Section 7100.1, vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the reasonable cost of disposition of the remains devolves upon, the following in the order named:(1) An agent under a power of attorney for health care who has the right and duty of disposition under Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600) of the Probate Code, except that the agent is liable for the costs of disposition only in either of the following cases:(A) Where the agent makes a specific agreement to pay the costs of disposition.(B) Where, in the absence of a specific agreement, the agent makes decisions concerning disposition that incur costs, in which case the agent is liable only for the reasonable costs incurred as a result of the agent’s decisions, to the extent that the decedent’s estate or other appropriate fund is insufficient.(2) The competent surviving spouse.(3) The sole surviving competent adult child of the decedent or, if there is more than one competent adult child of the decedent, the majority of the surviving competent adult children. However, less than the majority of the surviving competent adult children shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving competent adult children of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions by the majority of all surviving competent adult children.(4) The surviving competent parent or parents of the decedent. If one of the surviving competent parents is absent, the remaining competent parent shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section after reasonable efforts have been unsuccessful in locating the absent surviving competent parent.(5) The sole surviving competent adult sibling of the decedent or, if there is more than one surviving competent adult sibling of the decedent, the majority of the surviving competent adult siblings. However, less than the majority of the surviving competent adult siblings shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving competent adult siblings of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions by the majority of all surviving competent adult siblings.(6) The surviving competent adult person or persons respectively in the next degrees of kinship or, if there is more than one surviving competent adult person of the same degree of kinship, the majority of those persons. Less than the majority of surviving competent adult persons of the same degree of kinship shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section if those persons have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving competent adult persons of the same degree of kinship of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions by the majority of all surviving competent adult persons of the same degree of kinship.(7) A conservator of the person appointed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Division 4 of the Probate Code when the decedent has sufficient assets.(8) A conservator of the estate appointed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Division 4 of the Probate Code when the decedent has sufficient assets.(9) The public administrator when the deceased has sufficient assets.(b) (1) (A) If a person to whom the right of control has vested pursuant to subdivision (a) has been charged with first- or second-degree murder or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the decedent’s death and those charges are known to the funeral director or cemetery authority, the right of control is relinquished and passed on to the next of kin in accordance with subdivision (a).(B) If the charges against the person are dropped, or if the person is acquitted of the charges, the right of control is returned to the person.(C) Notwithstanding this subdivision, a person who has been charged with first- or second-degree murder or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the decedent’s death to whom the right of control has not been returned pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not have any right to control disposition pursuant to subdivision (a), which shall be applied, to the extent the funeral director or cemetery authority know about the charges, as if that person did not exist.(2) If the funeral director or cemetery authority knows that the person with the right of control pursuant to subdivision (a) meets either of the following conditions, the right of control is relinquished and passed on to the next of kin in accordance with subdivision (a):(A) The person with right of control was subject to a restraining order for domestic violence against the deceased at the time of the decedent’s death. (B) The person with right of control is a parent of the deceased and either Either of the following evidences that vesting the right to control to that person would have been contrary to the decedent’s best interests:(i) A court order, court finding, or other court determination.(ii) A will, agreement, or other legally determinative document.(3) (A) A funeral director or cemetery authority shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for a determination made pursuant to this subdivision.(B) A funeral director’s license or cemetery authority’s license shall not be subject to disciplinary action for a determination made pursuant to this subdivision.(c) A funeral director or cemetery authority shall have complete authority to control the disposition of the remains and to proceed under this chapter to recover usual and customary charges for the disposition when both of the following apply:(1) Either of the following applies:(A) The funeral director or cemetery authority has knowledge that none of the persons described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a) exists.(B) None of the persons described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a) can be found after reasonable inquiry, or contacted by reasonable means.(2) The public administrator fails to assume responsibility for disposition of the remains within seven days after having been given written notice of the facts. Written notice may be delivered by hand, United States mail, facsimile transmission, or telegraph.(d) The liability for the reasonable cost of final disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of the decedent in the same degree of kinship and upon the estate of the decedent. However, if a person accepts the gift of an entire body under Section 7150.15, that person, subject to the terms of the gift, shall be liable for the reasonable cost of final disposition of the decedent.(e) This section shall be administered and construed to the end that the expressed instructions of the decedent or the person entitled to control the disposition shall be faithfully and promptly performed.(f) A funeral director or cemetery authority shall not be liable to any person for carrying out the instructions of the decedent or the person entitled to control the disposition.(g) For purposes of this section, “adult” means an individual who has attained 18 years of age, “child” means a natural or adopted child of the decedent, and “competent” means an individual who has not been declared incompetent by a court of law or who has been declared competent by a court of law following a declaration of incompetence.(h) (1) For the purpose of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the designation of a person authorized to direct disposition (PADD) on a United States Department of Defense Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, as that form exists on December 31, 2011, or its successor form, shall take first priority and be used to establish an agent who has the right and duty of disposition for a decedent who died while on duty in any branch or component of the Armed Forces of the United States, as defined by Section 1481 of Title 10 of the United States Code.(2) This subdivision shall become operative only if the United States Department of Defense Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, and Section 1482(c) of Title 10 of the United States Code are amended to allow a servicemember to designate any person, regardless of the relationship of the designee to the decedent, as the agent who has the right of disposition of a servicemember’s remains.